District of Columbia statutes.
3-1205.08

Issuance of license, registration, or certification.

Each board shall issue a license, registration, or certification to an applicant who meets the requirements of this chapter and rules and regulations issued pursuant to this chapter to practice the health occupation regulated by the board.

History

Mar. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-99, § 508, 33 DCR 729
July 18, 2009, D.C. Law 18-26, § 2(e)(8), 56 DCR 4043

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 2-3305.8.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 18-26, in the section heading, inserted “, registration, or certification”; and substituted “license, registration, or certification”, for “license”.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(e)(8) of Health Occupations Revision General Amendment Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-146, July 28, 2009, 56 DCR 6308).